Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5471.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-21.2-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-21.2 entitled "Optional
Retirement for Members of Police Force and Firefighters" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-21.2-5. Retirement on service allowance.
(a) Retirement of a member on a service retirement allowance for members eligible to retire
on or before June 30, 2012, shall be made, subject to paragraph (a)(11) below, by the retirement
board as follows:
(1) Any member who has attained or attains age seventy (70) shall be retired as stated in §
45-21-16 subject to the discretions contained in that section; provided, that any member who is a
member of the Woonsocket fire department who has attained or attains an age of sixty-five (65)
years shall be retired. Retirement occurs on the first day of the next succeeding calendar month in
which the member has attained the age of sixty-five (65) years.
(2) Any member may retire pursuant to this subdivision upon written application to the
board stating at what time the member desires to retire; provided, that the member at the specified
time for retirement has attained an age of fifty-five (55) years and has completed at least ten (10)
years of total service, and notwithstanding that the member may have separated from service.
(3) Any member may retire pursuant to this subdivision upon written application to the
board stating at what time the member desires to retire; provided, that the member at the specified
time for retirement has completed at least twenty-five (25) years of total service, and

notwithstanding that the member may have separated from service.
(4) Any member may retire pursuant to this subdivision upon written application to the
board stating at what time the member desires to retire; provided, that the member at the specified
time for retirement has attained an age of fifty (50) years and has completed at least twenty (20)
years of total service, notwithstanding that the member may have separated from service; provided,
that the service retirement allowance, as determined according to the formula provided in § 45-
21.2-6, is reduced one-half of one percent (1/ %) for each month that the age of the member is less

than fifty-five (55) years.
(5) Any member of the South Kingstown police department may retire pursuant to this
subdivision upon written application to the board stating at what time the member desires to retire;
provided, that the member at the specified time for retirement has earned a service retirement
allowance of fifty percent (50%) of final compensation pursuant to § 45-21.2-6.1.
(6) Any member of the Johnston police department may retire pursuant to this subdivision
upon written application to the board stating at what time the member desires to retire; provided,
that the member at the specified time for retirement has earned a service retirement allowance of
fifty percent (50%) of final compensation pursuant to § 45-21.2-6.2.
(7) Any member of the Cranston fire department hired after July 1, 1995, or any member
of the Cranston fire department with five (5) years or less of service effective July 1, 1995, may
retire pursuant to this subdivision upon written application to the board stating at what time the
member desires to retire; provided, that the member at the specified time for retirement has earned
a service retirement allowance of fifty percent (50%) of final compensation for at least twenty (20)
years service; final compensation for Cranston fire department members is based on the
compensation components of weekly salary, longevity and holidays with longevity of the members
highest year of earnings and members shall receive a three percent (3%) escalation of their pension
payment compounded each year on January 1st following the year of retirement and continuing on
an annual basis on that date; further, any illness or injury not covered in title 45 relating to the
presumption of disability is governed by the collective bargaining agreement between the City of
Cranston and members of the Cranston fire department.
(8) Any member of the Cranston police department hired after July 1, 1995, or any member
of the Cranston police department with five (5) years or less of service effective July 1, 1995, may
retire pursuant to this subdivision upon written application to the board stating at what time the
member desires to retire; provided, that the member at the specified time for retirement has earned
a service retirement allowance of fifty percent (50%) of final compensation for at least twenty (20)
years service; final compensation for Cranston police department members is based on the
LC001395 - Page 2 of 6

compensation components of weekly salary, longevity and holidays with longevity of the members
highest year of earnings and members shall receive a three percent (3%) escalation of their pension
payment compounded each year on January 1st following the year of retirement and continuing on
an annual basis on that date; further, any illness or injury not covered in title 45 relating to the
presumption of disability is governed by the collective bargaining agreement between the City of
Cranston and members of the Cranston police department.
(9) Any member of the Hopkinton police department may retire pursuant to this subdivision
upon written application to the board stating at what time the member desires to retire; provided,
that the member at the specified time for retirement has earned a service retirement allowance of
fifty percent (50%) of final compensation for at least twenty (20) years service; final compensation
for Hopkinton police department members is based on the compensation components of weekly
salary, longevity and holidays with longevity of the members highest year of earnings and members
shall receive a three percent (3%) escalation of their pension payment compounded each year on
January 1st following the year of retirement and continuing on an annual basis on that date.
(10) Any member of the Richmond police department may retire pursuant to this
subdivision upon written application to the board stating at what time the member desires to retire;
provided, that the member at the specified time for retirement has earned a service retirement
allowance of fifty percent (50%) of final compensation for at least twenty-two (22) years’ service
pursuant to § 45-21.2-6.3.
(11) Notwithstanding any provision in this section to the contrary, for any service on or
after July 1, 2012, final compensation shall be defined in accordance with § 45-21.2-2, and no
benefit adjustments shall be provided except as set forth in § 45-21-52(c).
(12) Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, with respect to police
officers employed by the town of Johnston, only those police officers hired on or after July 1, 2010,
shall be eligible to be members of the Municipal Employees’ Retirement System of the state of
Rhode Island in accordance with this chapter.
(b) Retirement of a member on a service retirement allowance eligible to retire on and after
July 1, 2012, shall be made by the retirement board as follows:
(1) Any member may retire pursuant to this subdivision upon written application to the
board stating at what time the member desires to retire; provided, that the member at the specified
time for retirement attained the age of at least fifty-five (55) years and has completed at least
twenty-five (25) years of total service, and notwithstanding that the member may have separated
from service; or
(2) Effective July 1, 2015, the member makes contributions to the plan effective July 1,
LC001395 - Page 3 of 6

2015, in accordance with § 45-21.2-14, and (i) The member at the specified time for retirement
attained the age of at least fifty (50) years and has completed at least twenty-five (25) years of total
service; or (ii) The member has completed at least twenty-seven (27) years of total service
regardless of the member’s attained age, and notwithstanding that the member may have separated
from service.
(3) Any member with contributory service on or after July 1, 2012, who has completed at
least five (5) years of contributory service but who has not completed twenty-five (25) years of
service, shall be eligible to retire upon the attainment of the member’s Social Security retirement
age.
(4) If a member had ten (10) or more years of contributory service and attained age forty-
five (45) prior to July 1, 2012, and would have been eligible to retire at or prior to age fifty-two
(52) in accordance with the rules in effect prior to July 1, 2012, the member may retire upon
attainment of age fifty-two (52).
(5) Effective July 1, 2015, a member who has completed twenty (20) or more years of total
service who has attained an age within five (5) years of the eligible retirement age under
subparagraphs (b)(1) or (b)(2) or (b)(3) or (b)(4) above, may elect to retire provided that the
retirement allowance shall be reduced actuarially for each month that the age of the member is less
than the eligible retirement age under subparagraphs (b)(1) or (b)(2) or (b)(3) or (b)(4) above in
accordance with the following table:
Year Preceding Retirement Cumulative Annual Reduction Cumulative Monthly
Reduction
For Year 1 9% .75%
For Year 2 8% .667%
For Year 3 7% .583%
For Year 4 7% .583%
For Year 5 7% .583%
(i) Effective July 1, 2025, a member who has completed twenty (20) years or more of total
service and who has attained age fifty-seven (57), or more with at least twenty (20) years of service
may elect to retire, without a reduction as set forth in subsection (b)(5) of this section.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, a member on June 30, 2012, may
elect to retire at his or her eligible retirement date as determined under the rules in effect on June
30, 2012, provided that a member making an election under this paragraph shall receive the
member’s retirement benefit determined and calculated based on the member’s service and final
compensation as of June 30, 2012. This provision shall be interpreted and administered in a manner
LC001395 - Page 4 of 6

to protect a member’s accrued benefit on June 30, 2012.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001395
========
LC001395 - Page 5 of 6